Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 151B Workforce Education

151B.005.
Legislative recognition of need to improve adults’ knowledge, skills, and literacy.

The General Assembly recognizes that many adults need significant improvement in their knowledge and skills to be full participants in Kentucky’s workforce and society, to develop and maintain healthy families, and to continue their education and training as necessary throughout their lifetimes. The General Assembly also recognizes that:

Adult illiteracy is a fundamental barrier to every major challenge facing Kentucky, including early childhood education, education reform, economic development, and improving the health and well-being of Kentucky’s families and communities;

Kentucky must be committed to addressing the low level of education of the adult population from all dimensions of state and local government, all education institutions, business and civic leaders, voluntary organizations, and all others that interact with the problem of adult illiteracy; and

Kentucky must have a multi-faceted strategy to address the diverse needs of the undereducated adult population in all counties and regions of the state.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 526, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

151B.010.
Definitions for chapter. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.020.
Education and Workforce Development Cabinet — Major organizational units — Secretary.

The Education and Workforce Development Cabinet is hereby created, which shall constitute a cabinet of the state government within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12. The cabinet shall consist of a secretary and those administrative bodies and employees as provided by law.

The cabinet, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 12, shall be composed of the major organizational units listed below, units listed in KRS 12.020, and other departments, divisions, and sections as are from time to time deemed necessary for the proper and efficient operation of the cabinet:

The Department of Workforce Investment, which is hereby created and established within the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet. The department shall be directed and managed by a commissioner who shall be appointed by the Governor under the provisions of KRS 12.040, and who shall report to the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet. The department shall be composed of the following offices:

The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation, which is created by KRS 151B.185;

The Office of Unemployment Insurance;

The Office of Employer and Apprenticeship Services;

The Career Development Office;

The Office of Adult Education, which is created by KRS 151B.406;

The Unemployment Insurance Commission established by KRS 341.110;

The Kentucky Apprenticeship Council, which shall be attached to the department for administrative purposes only; and

The Division of Technical Assistance; and

The Early Childhood Advisory Council, which is attached to the Office of the Secretary for administrative purposes only.

The executive officer of the cabinet shall be the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet. The secretary shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 12.255 and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The secretary shall have general supervision and direction over all activities and functions of the cabinet and its employees and shall be responsible for carrying out the programs and policies of the cabinet. The secretary shall be the chief executive officer of the cabinet and shall have authority to enter into contracts, subject to the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, when the contracts are deemed necessary to implement and carry out the programs of the cabinet. The secretary shall have the authority to require coordination and nonduplication of services provided under the Federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, 20 U.S.C. secs. 9201 et seq. The secretary shall have the authority to mandate fiscal responsibility dispute resolution procedures among state organizational units for services provided under the Federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, 20 U.S.C. secs. 9201 et seq.

The secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet and the secretary’s designated representatives, in the discharge of the duties of the secretary, may administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records considered necessary and relevant as evidence at hearings held in connection with the administration of the cabinet.

The secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet may delegate any duties of the secretary’s office to employees of the cabinet as he or she deems necessary and appropriate, unless otherwise prohibited by statute.

The secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet shall promulgate, administer, and enforce administrative regulations that are necessary to implement programs mandated by federal law, or to qualify for the receipt of federal funds, and that are necessary to cooperate with other state and federal agencies for the proper administration of the cabinet and its programs except for programs and federal funds within the authority of the Department of Education, the Kentucky Board of Education, and the Education Professional Standards Board.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 1, effective July 1, 1990; 1992, ch. 395, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 469, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 134, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 217, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 261, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 271, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 50, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 156, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 199, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 38, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 300, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 29, § 6, effective June 24, 2003; 2003, ch. 31, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 211, § 21, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 13, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 15, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 59, §
38, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 146, § 11, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 173, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

151B.022.
National and state
criminal background check required for all cabinet and affiliated
employees with access to or use of federal tax information.

The Education and Workforce
Development Cabinet shall require a national and state criminal background
check for every employee of the cabinet or its agencies, including
contract staff, with access to or use of federal tax information.
The criminal background investigation shall be by means of a fingerprint
check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and Federal Bureau
of Investigation, pursuant to the following requirements:

The cabinet shall require
each employee with access to or use of federal tax information to
submit a complete and legible set of fingerprints to the Department
of Kentucky State Police on a fingerprint card issued by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation;

The Department of Kentucky State Police
shall submit the fingerprint card to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
for a national criminal background check after a state criminal background
check is conducted;

The results of a national and state
criminal background check shall not be distributed or otherwise released
by the cabinet, except that:

The cabinet shall provide an employee
the results of his or her national and state criminal background check
upon request; and

The cabinet may introduce the results,
under seal, as evidence in a legal proceeding which involves a challenge
to any personnel action taken by the cabinet which is based in whole
or in part on information contained in the results; and

Any fee charged by the Department of
Kentucky State Police or the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall
be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request
and conducting the background check.

The cabinet or its agencies shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with this section and KRS Chapter
13A to implement this section.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 200, § 1, effective April 26, 2018.

151B.023.
Department for Adult Education and Literacy. [Repealed.]

151B.0235.
State Advisory Council for Adult Education and Literacy. [Repealed.]

151B.025.
Office of Career and Technical Education — Kentucky Workforce Investment Board. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.030.
Organizational structure of Office of Career and Technical Education — Ombudsman. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.035.
Personnel of Office of Career and Technical Education — Administrative regulations — Appeals to Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.037.
Posting of full-time vacancies. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.040.
Employee benefits. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.045.
Personnel files. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.050.
Grounds for refusal to consider or to disqualify an applicant for, or to remove a person from, a certified or equivalent position. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.052.
Criminal conviction as grounds for disciplinary action. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.055.
Employees with continuing status. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.060.
Appeal from final order of board. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.065.
Payment of reinstated employee. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.070.
Employment status. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.075.
Employee evaluations. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.080.
Coercion of employees prohibited — Lay-off priorities. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.085.
Procedures for lay-offs. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.086.
Appeal to board of lay-off by continuing status employee. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.087.
Appeal of board’s final order relating to lay-off of continuing status employee. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.090.
Prohibited activities. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.095.
State Board for Adult and Technical Education. [Repealed.]

151B.097.
Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.100.
Powers of board. [Repealed.]

151B.105.
Meetings of board. [Repealed.]

151B.110.
Board to manage state-operated secondary area vocational education and technology centers. [Repealed.]

151B.112.
Office of Career and Technical Education to manage state-operated secondary area vocational education and technology centers. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.115.
State universities to operate vocational and nonvocational programs offered by them. [Renumbered.]

151B.120.
Agreements for training workers. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.125.
Equivalents to standard high school diploma — Diploma through examination — External diploma program. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.127.
Legislative findings relating to need for high school equivalency diplomas — Incentives — Administrative regulations — Learning contracts — Tuition discounts — Tax credit for employers. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.130.
Foundation for Adult Education. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.131.
Definitions for KRS 151B.131 to 151B.134.

As used in KRS 151B.131 to 151B.134, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics established in KRS 151B.134(1);

“De-identification” means a process for removing identity information so the data can be analyzed without disclosing the identity of the individuals or employers whose data are being utilized;

“Education data” means the following data relating to student performance from early childhood learning programs through postsecondary education:

College and career readiness;

Course and grade;

Degree, diploma, or credential attainment;

Demographic;

Educator;

Enrollment;

Financial aid;

High School Equivalency Diploma;

Remediation;

Retention;

State and national assessments;

Transcripts;

Vocational and technical education information; and

Any other data impacting education deemed necessary by the office;

“Kentucky Longitudinal Data System” is a statewide data system that contains education, workforce, and additional data identified by the Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics;

“Office” means the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics established in KRS 151B.132(1); and

“Workforce data” means data relating to:

Certification and licensure;

Employer information;

Employment status;

Geographic location of employment;

Job service and training information to support enhanced employment opportunities;

Wage information; and

Any other data impacting the workforce deemed necessary by the office.

History.
Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 90, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 63, § 11, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 154, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.132.
Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics — Purpose — Kentucky Longitudinal Data System — Collection of education and workforce data — Certification and ownership of data — Funding.

The Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics is hereby established and attached to the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet, Office of the Secretary.

The office’s purpose is to collect accurate data in the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System in order to link the data and generate timely reports about student performance through employment to be used to guide decision makers in improving the Commonwealth of Kentucky’s education system and training programs.

The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 12.050. The executive director shall be appointed from nominations made to the Governor by the board. The office may employ additional staff necessary to carry out the office’s duties consistent with available funding and state personnel laws.

The public agencies providing data to the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System shall be:

The Council on Postsecondary Education;

The Department of Education;

The Early Childhood Advisory Council;

The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;

The Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education; and

Other agencies of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet.

The Kentucky Longitudinal Data System, upon approval of the board, may include data from any additional public agency.

Any private institution of higher education, private school, or parochial school, upon approval of the board, may provide data to the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System.

Any data provided to the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System shall be certified to be accurate by the providing agency, institution, or school. Ownership of data provided shall be retained by the providing entity.

The office may receive funding for its operation of the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System from the following sources:

State appropriations;

Federal grants;

User fees; and

Any other grants or contributions from public agencies or other entities.

History.
Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 18, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 90, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 154, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.133.
Duties of Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.

The duties of the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics shall be to:

Oversee and maintain the warehouse of data in the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System;

Develop de-identification standards and processes using modern statistical methods;

Conduct research and evaluation regarding federal, state, and local education and training programs at all levels;

Audit and ensure compliance of education and training programs with applicable federal and state requirements as authorized by federal and state law;

Work with public agencies and other entities to define statewide education, workforce development, and employment metrics and ensure the integrity and quality of data being collected;

Link data from multiple sources for consideration in developing broad public policy initiatives;

Develop requirements and definitions for data to be provided by any public agency, private institution of higher education, private school, or parochial school, as directed by the Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics;

Develop a reasonable fee schedule for services provided;

Establish data quality standards;

Promulgate administrative regulations necessary for the proper administration of the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System;

Ensure compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. sec 1232g, and all other relevant federal and state privacy laws;

Respond to approved research data requests in accordance with the data access and use policy established by the board;

Develop and disseminate, in cooperation with the Council on Postsecondary Education and the Department of Education, information on the employment and earnings of the public postsecondary institution graduates in Kentucky. This information shall be updated at least every three (3) years and shall be:

Posted on the Web site of the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics;

Posted on the Web site of the Council on Postsecondary Education;

Posted on the Web site of each public postsecondary institution, with the Web site address published in each institution’s catalogue; and

Made available to every high school guidance and career counselor, who shall be notified of its availability for the purpose of informing all high school students preparing for postsecondary education; and

Enter into contracts or other agreements with appropriate entities, including but not limited to federal, state, and local agencies, to the extent necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities only if such contracts or agreements incorporate adequate protections with respect to the confidentiality of any information to be shared.

History.
Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 18, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 90, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2019 ch. 154, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.134.
Board of Kentucky Center for Statistics — Members — Duties and functions — Chair — Meetings.

The Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics is hereby established and attached to the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet, Office of the Secretary.

The board shall be composed of:

The commissioner of the Department of Education or designee;

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or designee;

The president of the Council on Postsecondary Education or designee;

The secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet or designee; and

The executive director of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority or designee.

The duties and functions of the board shall be to:

Develop a detailed data access and use policy for requests that shall include but not be limited to the following:

Direct access to data in the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System shall be restricted to authorized staff of the office;

Data or information that may result in any individual or employer being identifiable based on the size or uniqueness of the population under consideration may not be reported in any form by the office; and

The office may not release data or information if disclosure is prohibited under relevant federal or state privacy laws;

Establish the research agenda of the office;

Make nominations to the Governor for the appointment of an executive director;

Oversee compliance by the office with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g, and other relevant federal and state privacy laws;

Ensure that reports generated by the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics are distributed to appropriate personnel within the agencies represented by the board members; and

Provide general oversight of the office.

The secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet shall serve as chair of the board.

The board shall meet at least semiannually and at other times upon the call of the chair. The meetings shall be subject to the open meetings requirements of KRS 61.800 to 61.850 and 61.991.

The board may form committees, work groups, or advisory councils to accomplish its purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 18, § 4, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 90, § 4, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 26, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2019 ch. 154, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.135.
Governor’s Commission on Literacy. [Repealed.]

151B.140.
Statewide adult literacy program. [Repealed.]

151B.142.
Adult education and literacy initiative fund. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.145.
Federal acts relating to vocational education accepted. [Repealed and reenacted.]

151B.150.
Office of Career and Technical Education authorized to carry out vocational education programs. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.155.
State Treasurer custodian of funds. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.160.
Buildings for state vocational schools. [Repealed.]

151B.165.
Tuition and fees in secondary area vocational education and technology centers. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.170.
Liability insurance for motor vehicles owned or operated by office in vocational schools and centers. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.175.
Medical and accident insurance for students. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

151B.180.
Declaration of intent for KRS 151B.180 to 151B.210.

In enacting KRS 151B.180 to 151B.210, it is the intention of the General Assembly of Kentucky to provide for and improve the vocational rehabilitation of citizens of the Commonwealth of Kentucky with physical and mental disabilities in order that they may increase their social and economic well-being and the productive capacity of the Commonwealth and nation.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 35, effective July 1, 1990; 1994, ch. 405, § 20, effective July 15, 1994.

151B.185.
Office of Vocational Rehabilitation — Divisions.

The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation is hereby created within the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet, Department of Workforce Investment. The office shall consist of an executive director and those administrative bodies and employees provided or appointed pursuant to law. The office shall be composed of the Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise, the Division of Blind Services, the Division of Field Services, and the Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center. Each division shall be headed by a director appointed by the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet under the provisions of KRS 12.050, and shall be composed of organizational entities as deemed appropriate by the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet.

The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation shall have such powers and duties as contained in KRS 151B.180 to 151B.210 and KRS 163.450 to 163.480 and such other functions as may be established by administrative regulation.

The office shall be the sole state agency for the purpose of developing and approving state plans required by state or federal laws and regulations as prerequisites to receiving federal funds for vocational rehabilitation.

The chief executive officer of the office shall be the executive director of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation. The executive director shall be appointed by the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet under the provisions of KRS 12.050. The executive director shall have experience in vocational rehabilitation and supervision and shall have general supervision and direction over all functions of the office and its employees, and shall be responsible for carrying out the programs and policies of the office.

Except as otherwise provided, the office shall be the state agency responsible for all rehabilitation services and for other services as deemed necessary. The office shall be the agency authorized to expend all state and federal funds designated for rehabilitation services. The Office of the Secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet is authorized as the state agency to receive all state and federal funds and gifts and bequests for the benefit of rehabilitation services.

Employees under the jurisdiction of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation who are members of a state retirement system as of June 30, 1990, shall remain in their respective retirement systems.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 36, effective July 1, 1990; 1994, ch. 469, § 27, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 211, § 44, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 45, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 21, effective June 25, 2009; 2019 ch. 146, § 12, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.190.
Vocational rehabilitation services.

Vocational rehabilitation services shall be provided directly or through public or private instrumentalities to any individual with a physical or mental disability:

Who maintains a domicile in the Commonwealth at the time of filing his application therefor, and whose vocational rehabilitation the State Vocational Rehabilitation Agency determines after full investigation can be satisfactorily achieved; or

Who is eligible therefor under the terms of an agreement with another state or with the federal government.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 37, effective July 1, 1990; 1994, ch. 405, § 21, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 469, § 28, effective July 15, 1994.

151B.195.
Authority of the executive director of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.

The executive director of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation shall prescribe administrative regulations governing the services, personnel, and administration of the State Vocational Rehabilitation Agency; may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states to provide for the vocational rehabilitation of residents of the states concerned; may establish and supervise the operation of small businesses established pursuant to KRS 151B.180 to 151B.210 to be conducted by eligible individuals with severe disabilities; and may establish state funded special programs for vocational rehabilitation in the state vocational rehabilitation agency.

Except as provided in KRS 151B.190, the executive director may prescribe administrative regulations to establish fees for services provided to individuals or entities, public or private.

The executive director is authorized to provide liability insurance or an indemnity bond against the negligence of drivers of motor vehicles owned or operated by the office for the transportation of applicants or clients of the office. If the transportation is let out under contract, the contract shall require the contractor to carry an indemnity bond or liability insurance against negligence to such amounts as the executive director designates. In either case, the indemnity bond or insurance policy shall be issued by a surety or insurance company authorized to transact business in this state, and shall bind the company to pay any final judgment not to exceed the limits of the policy rendered against the insured for loss or damage to property of any applicant or client or other person, or death or injury of any applicant or client or other person.

The provisions of any other statute notwithstanding, the executive director is authorized to use receipt of funds from the Social Security reimbursement program for a direct service delivery staff incentive program. Incentives may be awarded if case service costs are reimbursed for job placement of Social Security or Supplemental Security Income recipients at the Substantial Gainful Activity (SGA) level for nine (9) months pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 422 and under those conditions and criteria as are established by the federal reimbursement program.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 38, effective July 1, 1990; 1998, ch. 33, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 211, § 45, effective July 12, 2006.

151B.200.
Federal acts relating to vocational rehabilitation.

This state accepts and agrees to comply with all the provisions of the Acts of Congress of the United States approved June 2, 1920 (41 Stat. 735) relating to vocational rehabilitation and all subsequent acts when such acts apply to joint state and federally funded vocational rehabilitation programs.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 39, effective July 1, 1990; 1994, ch. 363, § 8, effective July 15, 1994.

151B.205.
State Treasurer designated as custodian of funds.

The State Treasurer is hereby designated as the custodian of all funds. The State Treasurer shall make disbursements for vocational rehabilitation purposes upon certification by the executive director of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 40, effective July 1, 1990; 2006, ch. 211, § 46, effective July 12, 2006.

151B.210.
Gifts may be received.

The executive director of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation may accept and use gifts made by will or otherwise for carrying out the purposes of KRS 151B.180 to 151B.210. Gifts made under such conditions as in the judgment of the executive director of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation are proper and consistent with the provisions of KRS 151B.180 to 151B.210 may be so accepted and shall be held, invested, reinvested, and used in accordance with the provisions of KRS 151B.180 to 151B.210.

History.
Repealed and reenact. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 41, effective July 1, 1990; 2006, ch. 211, § 47, effective July 12, 2006.

151B.215.
Kentucky Occupational Information Coordinating Committee. [Repealed.]

151B.220.
Kentucky Job Training Coordinating Council. [Repealed.]

151B.225.
Client Assistance Program.

There is hereby created a Client Assistance Program which is assigned for administrative purposes to the Office of Legal and Legislative Services within the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet.

The Client Assistance Program shall pursue legal, administrative, and other appropriate remedies to ensure the protection of rights of individuals with disabilities who are receiving treatment, services, or rehabilitation under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended. If additional resources are required to perform the duties and responsibilities of the Client Assistance Program, the cabinet, on behalf of the Client Assistance Program, may contract with other state agencies to obtain necessary legal or other professional services.

The Office of Legal and Legislative Services shall serve as the agency in charge of all personnel, equipment, records, files, and funds pertaining to the Client Assistance Program as provided for in the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 470, § 44, effective July 1, 1990; 1994, ch. 405, § 22, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 469, § 31, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 300, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 211, § 48, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 22, effective June 25, 2009.

151B.230.
Foundation for Workforce Development — Funding — Board of trustees — Annual report. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 417, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 469, § 32, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 211, § 49, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 23, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2021 ch. 26, § 12, effective June 29, 2021.

151B.240.
Statewide Independent Living Council.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 469, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 211, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 211, § 50, effective July 12, 2006; was renumbered to be § 194A.115, by 2016, ch. 32, § 2, effective July 12, 2016.

151B.245.
Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation — Membership — Meetings.

The Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation is hereby created within the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation to accomplish the purposes and functions enumerated in 29 U.S.C. secs. 701 et seq. Members of the council shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to the guidelines in this section. When appointing members of the council, the Governor shall consider, to the greatest extent practicable, the extent to which minority populations are represented on the council.

The Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation shall consist of the following members which shall serve for the following staggered initial terms but their successors shall serve for a term of three (3) years:

One (1) representative of the Statewide Independent Living Council, who shall be the chair or other designee of the Statewide Independent Living Council and who shall serve an initial term of two (2) years;

One (1) representative of a parent training and information center established pursuant to Section 682(a) of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act who shall serve an initial term of one (1) year;

One (1) representative of the Client Assistance Program established under 34 C.F.R. pt. 370, who shall be designated by the employee of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet responsible for overseeing the Client Assistance Program and who shall serve an initial term of one (1) year;

One (1) representative of community rehabilitation program service providers who shall serve an initial term of three (3) years;

Four (4) representatives of business, industry, and labor who shall each serve an initial term of three (3) years;

One (1) representative of a disability group that includes individuals with physical, cognitive, sensory, and mental disabilities who shall serve an initial term of two (2) years;

One (1) representative of a disability group that includes individuals with disabilities who have difficulty representing themselves or are unable due to their disabilities to represent themselves who shall serve an initial term of two (2) years;

One (1) current or former applicant for or recipient of vocational rehabilitation services who shall serve for an initial term of one (1) year;

One (1) representative of the state educational agency responsible for the public education of students with disabilities who are eligible to receive services under Part B of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act who shall serve for an initial term of one (1) year;

One (1) representative of the Kentucky Workforce Investment Board who shall serve an initial term of one (1) year;

One (1) representative from the Kentucky Council for the Blind who shall serve an initial term of three (3) years;

One (1) representative from the National Federation for the Blind from Kentucky who shall serve an initial term of three (3) years;

One (1) representative from the Bluegrass Council of the Blind who shall serve an initial term of three (3) years;

One (1) representative from the State Committee of Blind Vendors who shall serve an initial term of one (1) year;

One (1) qualified vocational rehabilitation counselor with knowledge of and experience with vocational rehabilitation programs who serves as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the council if employed by the designated state agency and who shall serve an initial term of two (2) years; and

The executive director of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the council.

The members of the council shall not be compensated for their service on the council. Council members shall be reimbursed for their necessary expenses pursuant to KRS 12.029.

Including the initial appointment, and with the exception of the individuals set out in paragraphs (c) and (p) of subsection (2) of this section, members shall serve no more than two (2) successive terms. A member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the end of the term for which the predecessor was appointed shall be appointed for the remainder of the predecessor’s term.

A chair shall be selected by the members of the council from among the voting members of the council, subject to the veto power of the Governor.

No member of the council shall cast a vote on any matter that would provide direct financial benefit to the member or the member’s organization or otherwise give the appearance of a conflict of interest under state law.

A majority of the members of the council shall be individuals with disabilities who meet the requirements of 34 C.F.R. sec. 361.5(c)(28) and who are not employed by the designated state unit.

The council shall convene at least four (4) meetings a year in locations determined by the council to be necessary to conduct council business. The meetings shall be publicly announced, open, and accessible to the general public, including individuals with disabilities, unless there is a valid reason for an executive session under the Open Meetings Act, KRS 61.805 to 61.850.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 469, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 211, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 211, § 51, effective July 12, 2006; 2019 ch. 146, § 13, effective June 27, 2019.

151B.250.
School-to-Careers System — Office of Career and Technical Education. [Repealed.]

151B.255.
Representative group for Office of School-to-Work. [Repealed.]

151B.260.
Department for Training and Reemployment — Appointment of commissioner. [Repealed.]